test/src/gt-norm-yamls/V-teevvad_gt-norm.yaml
Config:
  hfst:
    Gen: ../../../src/generator-gt-norm.hfst
    Morph: ../../../src/analyser-gt-norm.hfst
  xerox:
    Gen: ../../../src/generator-gt-norm.xfst
    Morph: ../../../src/analyser-gt-norm.xfst
    App: lookup

Tests:

# todo:
# Proofread the gold standard (below)
# Then: run analyser, then correct. 


  Verb - teevvad: # Verb 'to fix/korjata' - full paradigm
     teevvad+V+Ind+Prs+Sg1: teevam
     teevvad+V+Ind+Prs+Sg2: teevak
     teevvad+V+Ind+Prs+Sg3: teevv
     teevvad+V+Ind+Prs+Pl1: teevvap
     teevvad+V+Ind+Prs+Pl2: teevvʼveʹted
     teevvad+V+Ind+Prs+Pl3: tevva
     teevvad+V+Ind+Prs+Sg4: teevat
     teevvad+V+Ind+Prt+Sg1: tivvum
     teevvad+V+Ind+Prt+Sg2: tivvuk
     teevvad+V+Ind+Prt+Sg3: teevai
     teevvad+V+Ind+Prt+Pl1: [teevaim, teevain]
     teevvad+V+Ind+Prt+Pl2: teevaid
     teevvad+V+Ind+Prt+Pl3: tivvu
     teevvad+V+Ind+Prt+Sg4: tivvuš
     teevvad+V+Pot+Sg1: teevžem
     teevvad+V+Pot+Sg2: teevžiǩ
     teevvad+V+Pot+Sg3: teevaž
     teevvad+V+Pot+Pl1: [teevžep, teevžim, teevžin]
     teevvad+V+Pot+Pl2: teevžid 
     teevvad+V+Pot+Pl3: teevže
     teevvad+V+Pot+Sg4: teevžet
     teevvad+V+Pot+ConNeg: teevže
     teevvad+V+Cond+Sg1: teevčem
     teevvad+V+Cond+Sg2: [teevčiǩ, teevčeǩ]
     teevvad+V+Cond+Sg3: teevči
     teevvad+V+Cond+Pl1: [teevčim, teevčin, teevčep]
     teevvad+V+Cond+Pl2: teevčid
     teevvad+V+Cond+Pl3: teevče
     teevvad+V+Cond+Sg4: teevčeš
     teevvad+V+Cond+ConNeg: teevče
     teevvad+V+Imprt+Sg2: teev
     teevvad+V+Imprt+Sg3: teevas
     teevvad+V+Imprt+Pl1: teevvap
     teevvad+V+Imprt+Pl2: teevvad
     teevvad+V+Imprt+Pl3: tevvaz
     teevvad+V+Imprt+ConNeg: teev
     teevvad+V+Imprt+ConNegII: tivvu
     teevvad+V+Actio+Ess: teevvmen
     teevvad+V+Actio: teevvam
     teevvad+V+Act+PrsPrc: teevvai
     teevvad+V+Act+PrfPrc: teevvam
     teevvad+V+Pass+PrfPrc: tivvum
     teevvad+V+VAbess: [teevkani, teevǩeânai, teevǩani, teevǩâni, teevkâni, teevǩeânnai, teevǩenai, teevǩânai]
     teevvad+V+Ger+Loc: teeveeʹst
     teevvad+V+Ger+Ess: teeveeʹn
     teevvad+V+Ger+Instr: teeveeʹl
